Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 8 Relocation Assistance

Cross references.

Relocation assistance for persons, businesses, and others displaced by federal-aid public works projects, T. 22, C. 4.

Duties of counties regarding relocation assistance, §

32-4-41

.

Duties of municipalities regarding relocation assistance, §

32-4-92

.

32-8-1.
Relocation assistance in accordance with Uniform Act; real property acquisition.

As used in this chapter, the term “Uniform Act” means the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, as amended by the Uniform Relocation Act Amendments of 1987, Title IV of Public Law 100-17. The department, as required by the Uniform Act:

Shall make or approve payments, in accordance with Section 210 of the Uniform Act, for relocation expenses and replacement housing expenses and shall provide relocation assistance advisory services outlined in Section 205 of the Uniform Act; and

Shall make or approve payments, in accordance with Section 305(2) of the Uniform Act, to any person, family, business, farm operation, or nonprofit organization whose real property has been acquired by the department or is subject to a condemnation proceeding brought by the department for any federal-aid project in the state, the costs of which are now or hereafter financed in whole or in part from federal funds allocated to the department:

For expenses incident to the transfer of real property acquired by the department, prepayment of mortgage penalties, and a pro rata portion of real property taxes on real property acquired by the department;

For litigation expenses actually incurred by the condemnee in any condemnation proceeding brought by the department if the final judgment is that the department cannot acquire the real property by condemnation or the condemnation proceeding is formally abandoned by the department; or

For litigation expenses incurred by the plaintiff in any inverse condemnation proceeding brought against the department in which judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff.

In acquiring real property for any federal-aid project, the costs of which are financed in whole or in part from federal funds allocated to the department, the department shall be guided to the greatest extent practicable under state law by the land acquisition policies in Section 301 of the Uniform Act and the provisions of Section 302 of the Uniform Act.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed as creating in any condemnation proceeding brought under the power of eminent domain any element of value or of damage.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 588, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 495, §§ 3, 6; Ga. L. 1972, p. 931, §§ 3-10; Code 1933, § 95A-623, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1737, § 3.

U.S. Code.

The Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 4601

et seq.

32-8-2.
Last resort replacement housing for persons displaced by federal-aid projects.

The department shall have the authority, as a last resort, to provide replacement housing when a federal-aid project financed in whole or in part with federal aid cannot proceed to actual construction because no comparable replacement sale or rental housing is available. In carrying out the relocation assistance activities, the department, with prior concurrence of the board, shall be authorized to make payments, construct or reconstruct with its own forces, cause to be constructed or reconstructed, and purchase by deed or condemnation any real property for the purposes of providing replacement housing. The department may exchange, lease, or sell to the displaced person such replacement housing. Whenever any real property has been acquired under this Code section and thereafter the department determines that all or any part of such property or any interest therein is no longer needed for such purposes because of changed conditions, the department is authorized to dispose of such property or interest therein in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 32-7-4.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-623.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 775, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1737, § 3.

32-8-3.
[Reserved] Relocation assistance to persons displaced by federal-aid river and harbor improvement projects; real property acquisition.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 973, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 31; repealed by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1737, § 3, effective April 12, 1988.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 1737, § 3 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 12, 1988.

32-8-4.
Persons displaced by state-aid projects on the state highway system.

The department is authorized to make or approve payments for all necessary relocation expenses, replacement housing expenses, relocation advisory services, expenses incident to the transfer of real property, and litigation expenses as provided for in subparagraphs (a)(2)(A), (a)(2)(B), and (a)(2)(C) of Code Section 32-8-1 of any individual, family, business, farm operation, or nonprofit organization displaced by a state-aid highway project on the state highway system, the cost of which is now or hereafter financed in whole or in part from state funds. The department shall be guided by the policies, provisions, and limitations of the Uniform Act. The department shall not implement any relocation assistance on any state-aid projects on the state highway system without the prior concurrence of the board.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-623.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 775, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1737, § 3.

U.S. Code.

The Uniform Act, referred to in this Code section, is known as the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 and is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 4601

et seq.

32-8-5.
Last resort replacement housing for persons displaced by state-aid projects on the state highway system.

The department shall have the authority, as a last resort, to provide replacement housing when a state-aid project on the state highway system cannot proceed to actual construction because no comparable replacement sale or rental housing is available. In carrying out the relocation assistance activities, the department, with prior concurrence of the board, shall be authorized to make payments, construct or reconstruct with its own forces, cause to be constructed or reconstructed, and purchase by deed or condemnation any real property for the purposes of relocating or constructing replacement housing. The department may exchange, lease, or sell to the displaced person such replacement housing. Whenever any real property has been acquired under this Code section and thereafter the department determines that all or any part of said property or any interest therein is no longer needed for such purposes because of changed conditions, the department is authorized to dispose of such property or interest therein in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 32-7-4.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-623.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 775, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1737, § 3.

32-8-6.
Construction of chapter; power of department to take action necessary to secure benefit of federal-aid programs.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to conflict with any federal law, and in case of such conflict such portion as may be in conflict with such federal law is declared of no effect to the extent of the conflict.

The department is authorized to take the necessary steps to secure the full benefit of any federal-aid program and to meet any contingencies not provided for in this chapter, abiding at all times by a fundamental purpose to plan, construct, reconstruct, and maintain, as economically as possible, the public roads and other major transportation facilities of Georgia which will best promote the interest, welfare, and progress of the citizens of Georgia.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-624, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 973, § 8; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1737, § 3.